Missouri, session 2026, HB3432.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 537.610, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 537.610, to read as follows:
537.610. 1. The commissioner of administration, through the purchasing division,
and the governing body of each political subdivision of this state, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, may purchase liability insurance for tort claims, made against the state or the
political subdivision, but the maximum amount of such coverage shall not exceed [two] five
million dollars for all claims arising out of a single occurrence and shall not exceed [three
hundred thousand] two million dollars for any one person in a single accident or occurrence,
except for those claims governed by the provisions of the Missouri workers' compensation
law, chapter 287, and no amount in excess of the above limits shall be awarded or settled
upon. Sovereign immunity for the state of Missouri and its political subdivisions is waived
only to the maximum amount of and only for the purposes covered by such policy of
insurance purchased pursuant to the provisions of this section and in such amount and for
such purposes provided in any self-insurance plan duly adopted by the governing body of any
political subdivision of the state.
2. The liability of the state and its public entities on claims within the scope of
sections 537.600 to 537.650, shall not exceed [two] five million dollars for all claims arising
out of a single accident or occurrence and shall not exceed [three hundred thousand] two
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3432 2
million dollars for any one person in a single accident or occurrence, except for those claims
governed by the provisions of the Missouri workers' compensation law, chapter 287.
3. No award for damages on any claim against a public entity within the scope of
sections 537.600 to 537.650, shall include punitive or exemplary damages.
4. If the amount awarded to or settled upon multiple claimants exceeds [two] five
million dollars, any party may apply to any circuit court to apportion to each claimant his
proper share of the total amount limited by subsection 1 of this section. The share
apportioned each claimant shall be in the proportion that the ratio of the award or settlement
made to him bears to the aggregate awards and settlements for all claims arising out of the
accident or occurrence, but the share shall not exceed [three hundred thousand] two million
dollars.
5. The limitation on awards for liability provided for in this section shall be increased
or decreased on an annual basis effective January first of each year in accordance with the
Implicit Price Deflator for Personal Consumption Expenditures as published by the Bureau of
Economic Analysis of the United States Department of Commerce. The current value of the
limitation shall be calculated by the director of the department of commerce and insurance,
who shall furnish that value to the secretary of state, who shall publish such value in the
Missouri Register as soon after each January first as practicable, but it shall otherwise be
exempt from the provisions of section 536.021.
6. Any claim filed against any public entity under this section shall be subject to the
penalties provided by supreme court rule 55.03, or any successor rule.
✔